Louisiana, session 2026, HB930.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:627(A) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 40:624.1 and
628(E) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§624.1. Cottage cosmetic facilities
A.(1) A cottage cosmetic facility shall not be required to obtain a permit in
accordance with R.S. 40:628.
(2) A cottage cosmetic facility shall not be subject to any fees or charges
imposed pursuant to R.S. 40:628.
(3) A cottage cosmetic facility shall not be subject to routine or periodic
inspection by the department.
(4) A cottage cosmetic facility shall register and collect any local sales and
use taxes that are applicable to the sale of cosmetics as evidenced by a current sales
tax certificate issued to the seller by the sales and use tax collector for the parish in
which the sales occur.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 930 ENROLLED
B. A cottage cosmetic facility is an entity that satisfies all of the following:
(1) Manufactures, packs, or holds cosmetic products for distribution.
(2) Is located in a private residence within this state.
(3) Has a total annual wholesale sales of cosmetic products not exceeding
one hundred thousand dollars per calendar year.
C. A cottage cosmetic facility may not be eligible for the exception provided
for in this Section if it does any of the following:
(1) Manufacture any of the following products:
(a) A cosmetic product that regularly comes into contact with the mucus
membrane of the eye under conditions that are customary or usual.
(b) Cosmetic products that are injected.
(c) Cosmetic products that are intended for internal use.
(d) Cosmetic products that are intended to alter appearance for more than
twenty-four hours under conditions that are customary or usual and removal by the
consumer is not part of such conditions of use that are customary and usual.
(2) Manufacture any product that makes claims to diagnose, cure, mitigate,
treat, or prevent disease, or that affects the structure or function of the human body
with meaning provided by federal law.
D. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to exempt any cottage cosmetic
facility or responsible person from compliance with the Federal Food, Drug, and
Cosmetic Act, including the Modernization of Cosmetics Regulation Act of 2022,
and any regulations promulgated thereafter.
E. Facilities that sell cosmetic products directly to consumers shall be
regulated in accordance with the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, including
the Modernization of Cosmetic Regulation Act of 2022, and are not subject to the
facility permitting and inspection requirements of this Chapter. Nothing in this
Section shall be construed to exempt a person from applicable state and local sales
and use tax laws, including registration requirements.
* * *
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 930 ENROLLED
§627. Registration of certain products
A. Except as provided in Subsection E of this Section, the department may
require all manufacturers, packers, or proprietors of processed foods, proprietary or
patent medicines, and prophylactic devices, and cosmetics, in package form, to
register each separate and distinct product annually with the department and to
supply it with a sample of each such product upon request.
* * *
§628. Examination and investigation fee; food and drug control fees
* * *
E. The provisions of this Section do not apply to a cottage cosmetic facility
as defined in R.S. 40:624.1.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.